Maryland, session 2025, HB0808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–121.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ANNUAL CHARGE” MEANS THE CHARGE ASSESSED BY
THE COLUMBIA ASSOCIATION ON RESIDENTIAL OR COMMERCIAL REAL PROPERTY
IN HOWARD COUNTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO COLUMBIA ASSOCIATION COVENANTS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO LEASES FOR RESIDENTIAL AND
COMMERCIAL REAL PROPERTY IN HOWARD COUNTY THAT ARE SUBJECT TO
COLUMBIA ASSOCIATION COVENANTS.
(C) IF A LANDLORD REQUIRES A TENANT TO PAY ALL OR PART OF AN
ANNUAL CHARGE AS A PART OF THE RENT, THE LANDLORD SHALL USE A WRITTEN
LEASE THAT INCLUDES:
(1) NOTICE OF THE AMOUNT OF THE ANNUAL CHARGE THAT IS
INCLUDED IN THE RENT; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 584 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE ANNUAL CHARGE IS CALCULATED.
(D) A LANDLORD SHALL USE A WRITTEN LEASE THAT INCLUDES A
DESCRIPTION OF, OR INSTRUCTIONS ON WHERE TO FIND A DESCRIPTION OF, THE
RIGHTS AND PRIVILEGES AFFORDED TO:
(1) FOR A RESIDENTIAL LEASE, THE TENANT AS A RESIDENT OF REAL
PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO COLUMBIA ASSOCIATION COVENANTS AND
GOVERNING DOCUMENTS; OR
(2) FOR A COMMERCIAL LEASE, THE TENANT’S EMPLOYEES ASSIGNED
TO THE SITE THAT IS SUBJECT TO COLUMBIA ASSOCIATION COVENANTS AND
GOVERNING DOCUMENTS.
(E) (1) WHEN A TENANT SIGNS A LEASE, THE LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE
THE TENANT WITH A COPY OF:
(I) THE COLUMBIA ASSOCIATION COVENANTS AND
GOVERNING DOCUMENTS; AND
(II) IF THE LEASE IS FOR RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, THE
GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE VILLAGE ASSOCIATION OR TOWN CENTER, AS
APPROPRIATE.
(2) A LANDLORD MAY SATISFY THE REQUIREMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION BY PROVIDING A PHYSICAL COPY, DIGITAL
COPY, OR PERMANENT LINK TO A DIGITAL COPY OF THE COVENANTS AND
GOVERNING DOCUMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –